Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2173.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, is amended by adding definitions to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Computed tomography." The process of producing sectional or three-dimensional images using external ionizing radiation for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions.* * *"Diagnostic medical sonography." The use of high-frequency sound waves with specialized equipment to direct the sound waves into an area of the human body to generate an image for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions.* * *"Fluoroscopy." The process of producing real-time images using external ionizing radiation for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions . * * *"Ionizing radiation." Radiation that consists of alpha particles, beta particles, gamma rays, x-rays, neutrons, high-speed electrons, high-speed protons or other particles capable of producing ions. The term does not include non-ionizing radiation, including high-frequency sound waves, magnetic fields, microwaves, radiofrequency signals or visible, infrared or ultraviolet light.* * *"Licensed practitioner." An individual who is a licensed physician, dentist, chiropractor or podiatrist in this 20260HB2173PN2947 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth."Limited x-ray machine operations." The performance of radiography limited to chest, extremities, spine, skull and sinuses or bone densitometry procedures using equipment that emits external ionizing radiation resulting in radiographic images or bone density measurements."Magnetic resonance imaging." The process of using a magnetic field and radio frequency waves to produce sectional or three-dimensional images of internal structures of the human body for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions . * * *"Medical imaging." A modality used to produce images of the internal structures of the human body for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions through the use of electromagnetic waves, sound waves, radio waves, magnetic fields, ionizing radiation or radioactive materials."Medical imaging certification organization." A national organization that specializes in the certification and registration of medical imaging or radiation therapy technical personnel and is accredited by the NCCA , the American National Standards Institute or another accreditation organization recognized by the board."Medical imaging professional." An individual, other than a licensed practitioner , who is licensed to perform medical imaging by the board in a modality for which the individual is certified to perform by a medical imaging certification organization.* * *20260HB2173PN2947 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Modality." The type of medical imaging a licensed medical imaging professional is certified to perform, including any of the following:(1) Diagnostic medical sonography.(2) Limited x-ray machine operations.(3) Magnetic resonance imaging.(4) Nuclear medicine technology.(5) Radiography.* * *"Nuclear medicine technology." Medical imaging that utilizes sealed and unsealed radioactive materials for diagnostic, treatment and research purposes. The term includes any of the following:(1) The procurement, preparation and administration of radiopharmaceuticals, adjunctive and imaging medications. (2) The combination of nuclear medicine instrumentation with computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging or other modalities to produce a three-dimensional image with or without adjunctive and imaging medications to enhance the evaluation of physiological processes at a molecular level.* * *"Radiation therapist." An individual, other than a licensed physician , who is licensed to practice radiation therapy by the board."Radiation therapy." The use of ionizing radiation for treating disease."Radiography." The process of obtaining an image using external ionizing radiation for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions . "Radiologist." A physician who is licensed in this 20260HB2173PN2947 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth and is certified by the American Board of Radiology, the American Osteopathic Board of Radiology, the Royal College of Radiology or the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada as a radiologist."Radiologist assistant." An individual, other than a licensed physician, who is licensed to practice advanced diagnostic imaging procedures by the board.* * *"Trainee." An individual who has met the requirements and the regulations promulgated under this act to hold a temporary license issued by the board as a medical imaging professional, radiation therapist or radiologist assistant.* * *Section 2. Sections 13.1(a)(3), 13.3(f)(2), 13.4(e)(2) and 13.5(a)(1) of the act are amended to read:Section 13.1. Respiratory therapists.(a) Qualifications.--An individual shall be eligible to apply for licensure as a respiratory therapist if that individual satisfies all of the following:* * *(3) Has proved to the satisfaction of the board that the individual is of good moral character and is not unfit or unable to practice as a respiratory therapist by reason of physical or mental impairment. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).* * *Section 13.3. Perfusionist.20260HB2173PN2947 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(f) Qualifications.--An applicant shall be licensed to practice perfusion under this act if the applicant meets all of the following qualifications and has otherwise complied with the provisions of this act:* * *(2) The person is of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).* * *Section 13.4. Genetic counselor.* * *(e) Qualifications.--An applicant shall be licensed to practice genetic counseling under this act if the applicant meets all of the following qualifications and has otherwise complied with the provisions of this act:* * *(2) The person is of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).* * *Section 13.5. Prosthetists, orthotists, pedorthists and orthotic fitters.(a) Licensure qualifications.--To qualify for licensure to practice prosthetics, orthotics, pedorthics or orthotic fitting, an applicant shall:20260HB2173PN2947 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Be of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 13.7. Medical imaging professionals, radiation therapists, radiologist assistants and trainees.(a) License required.--Beginning two years after the effective date of this subsection, it shall be unlawful for an individual who is not licensed under this section to perform or offer to perform medical imaging, radiation therapy or radiography procedures on a human body for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions or practice as a medical imaging professional, radiation therapist or radiologist assistant.(b) Medical imaging professional license.--The board shall issue a license as a medical imaging professional to an applicant who meets all of the following requirements:(1) Is at least 18 years of age. (2) Submits an application and the required fee as established by the board by regulation.(3) Is of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions).(4) Has a high school diploma or its equivalent. (5) Satisfactorily completes a course of study in 20260HB2173PN2947 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 diagnostic medical sonography, magnetic resonance imaging, nuclear medicine technology or radiography or an equivalent course of study determined by the board.(6) Passes an applicable modality or specialization examination administered by a medical imaging certification organization approved by the board.(c) Medical imaging professional scope of practice.--A medical imaging professional shall only perform the functions of the modality in which the medical imaging professional has received education and training, and certification by a medical imaging certification organization.(d) Radiation therapist license.--The board shall issue a license as a radiation therapist to an applicant who meets all of the following requirements:(1) Is at least 18 years of age. (2) Submits an application and the required fee as established by the board by regulation.(3) Is of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113. (4) Has a high school diploma or its equivalent.(5) Satisfactorily completes a course of study in radiation therapy or an equivalent course of study determined by the board.(6) Passes an applicable radiation therapy examination administered by a medical imaging certification organization approved by the board.(e) Radiation therapist scope of practice.--A radiation therapist may use ionizing radiation to deliver radiation 20260HB2173PN2947 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 therapy treatments and perform treatment simulation using a medical imaging modality and shall execute treatment plan procedures and dosimetric calculations as prescribed by a licensed physician.(f) Radiologist assistant license.--The board shall issue a license as a radiologist assistant to an applicant who meets all of the following requirements:(1) Is at least 18 years of age.(2) Submits an application and the required fee as established by the board by regulation.(3) Is of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113. (4) Has a high school diploma or its equivalent. (5) Satisfactorily completes a course of study in radiologist assistant or an equivalent course of study determined by the board.(6) Passes an applicable radiologist assistant examination administered by a medical imaging certification organization approved by the board.(7) Holds a current certification in radiography and as a radiologist assistant issued by a medical imaging certification organization approved by the board.(g) Radiologist assistant scope of practice.-- (1) A radiologist assistant may perform advanced diagnostic imaging procedures under the supervision of a supervising radiologist. The procedures under this subsection shall include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(i) Enteral and parenteral procedures.20260HB2173PN2947 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Injection of diagnostic agents and physician-prescribed medications.(iii) Diagnostic and therapeutic aspirations and localizations.(iv) Radiologist directed invasive procedures.(v) Fluoroscopy procedures.(vi) Entering orders as directed by the supervising radiologist.(vii) Obtaining informed consent as a qualified practitioner under section 504 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act.(2) A radiologist assistant may not interpret medical imaging, render diagnoses or prescribe medication or therapies.(3) A radiologist assistant and the supervising radiologist shall establish written clinical protocols in accordance with the following:(i) The clinical protocols shall identify the supervising radiologist and be signed by the supervising radiologist.(ii) The clinical protocols shall describe the radiologist assistant's scope of practice.(iii) The clinical protocols shall describe the nature and degree of supervision that the supervising radiologist will provide the radiologist assistant.(iv) The supervising radiologist, the radiologist assistant or a delegate of the supervising radiologist and the radiologist assistant shall prepare and submit the clinical protocols to the board.20260HB2173PN2947 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The clinical protocols under paragraph (3) shall take effect upon submission to the board by a supervising radiologist, a radiologist assistant or a delegate of the supervising radiologist and the radiologist assistant.(5) It shall not be a defense in an administrative or civil action that a radiologist assistant acted outside the scope of the clinical protocols submitted to the board under paragraph (3) or that a supervising radiologist utilized the radiologist assistant outside the scope of the clinical protocols due to the supervising radiologist or radiologist assistant authorizing another individual to represent to the board that the description of the radiologist assistant's scope of practice had been approved by the supervising radiologist or radiologist assistant.(6) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the clinical protocols under paragraph (3) to be approved by the board.(h) Current professionals.--The board shall issue a license under this section to an individual practicing as a medical imaging professional, radiation therapist or radiologist assistant if the individual meets all of the following requirements within two years of the effective date of this subsection:(1) Is at least 18 years of age.(2) Submits an application and the required fee as established by the board by regulation.(3) Is of good moral character. In assessing the moral character of an individual with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113. 20260HB2173PN2947 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Holds a current license or certification as a medical imaging professional, radiation therapist or radiologist assistant issued by a medical imaging certification organization approved by the board.(i) Use of title.--Beginning two years after the effective date of this subsection, an individual who holds an active license under this section may do any of the following:(1) Hold oneself out as a licensed medical imaging professional, radiation therapist or radiologist assistant.(2) Use a title indicating the specific modality for which the individual is licensed under this section.(3) Use any words, symbols or abbreviations indicating the specific modality for which the individual is licensed under this section.(j) Temporary licensure for trainees.--(1) Upon the submission of a board-approved written application and fee, the board may issue a temporary license to practice as a medical imaging professional trainee, radiation therapist trainee or a radiologist assistant trainee to an applicant who is a student or graduate of an approved institution of higher learning.(2) A trainee shall be responsible to and under the direct and immediate personal supervision of a supervising radiologist.(3) The board shall only issue one temporary license to an applicant under this subsection and the temporary license shall expire one year after the date of issuance or upon the trainee obtaining a license as a medical imaging professional, radiation therapist or radiologist assistant.(4) The following apply:20260HB2173PN2947 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The board shall promulgate temporary regulations for the purpose of temporary licensure under this subsection, which shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The regulations shall not be subject to:(A) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(B) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(C) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(D) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(ii) The authority of the board to adopt temporary regulations under subparagraph (i) shall expire six months after the effective date of this subparagraph. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(k) Exemptions.--The licensure requirements under this section shall not apply to any of the following:(1) An individual licensed in this Commonwealth whose scope of practice includes performing medical imaging, radiation therapy or radiography.(2) A physician assistant licensed under this act or the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, or a certified registered nurse practitioner licensed under the act of May 22, 1951 20260HB2173PN2947 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, who:(i) performs fluoroscopy and has completed training acceptable to the board;(ii) is working under the supervision of a licensed physician who interprets diagnostic medical imaging studies, performs medical imaging guided procedures or provides radiation therapy;(iii) provides a direct report to the supervising physician of each fluoroscopy procedure performed; and(iv) has met the requirements under 25 Pa. Code § 221.16 (relating to training, competency and continuing education) or 49 Pa. Code Ch. 18 Subch. E (relating to performance of radiologic procedures by auxiliary personnel).(3) Auxiliary personnel under the supervision of a licensed chiropractor who is permitted to perform x-rays under the act of December 16, 1986 (P.L.1646, No.188), known as the Chiropractic Practice Act.(4) Auxiliary personnel under the supervision of a licensed dentist who is authorized to perform x-rays under section 11.4 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.216, No.76), known as The Dental Law.(5) Auxiliary personnel under the supervision of a doctor of podiatric medicine who is permitted to perform x-rays under section 21.2 of the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1206, No.375), known as the Podiatry Practice Act . (6) An individual performing sonography procedures within the individual's scope of practice that is used to assess information about a patient's immediate condition, is 20260HB2173PN2947 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limited to a focused imaging target and does not generate a recorded diagnostic medical image, including an assessment of any of the following:(i) Fetal presentation or heartbeat.(ii) Fluid in a body cavity.(iii) Foreign body position or location.(iv) Fetal monitoring during active labor. (v) An anatomical landmark or blood vessel for vascular access or administration of anesthesia.(7) A physician in graduate medical training or a student enrolled in and attending a school or college of medicine, dentistry, chiropractic, podiatry, medical imaging or radiation therapy who performs medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures on a human body while under the supervision of a licensed practitioner or the supervision of an individual holding a license under this section in the supervised modality.(8) A student enrolled in a medical imaging educational program recognized by the board who is employed by a medical facility affiliated with the program to perform authorized medical imaging procedures for which the student has a demonstrated competency if the medical imaging procedures are performed under the supervision of a licensed practitioner or the supervision of an individual holding a license under this section in the supervised modality.(9) An individual employed by the Federal Government to provide medical imaging or radiation therapy services while discharging the individual's official duties.(10) An individual performing medical imaging or radiation therapy procedures on nonhuman subjects or 20260HB2173PN2947 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cadavers.(l) Authorizations and restrictions.-- (1) A licensee under this section may use radioactive substances or equipment emitting ionizing radiation, high-frequency sound waves or magnetic resonance and perform medical imaging and radiation therapy procedures on a human body for diagnostic purposes or for the purpose of providing guidance during medical interventions only: (i) with a valid prescription of an individual authorized by the Commonwealth to prescribe medical imaging and radiation therapy procedures;(ii) under the supervision of a licensed practitioner; and(iii) within the scope of the license as specified under this section and the regulations promulgated by the board and in a modality for which the licensee has received education and training.(2) A licensee under this section may not make a diagnostic interpretation of an image, make a diagnosis or prescribe a medication or therapy.(m) License renewal.--A license under this section shall be subject to biennial renewal. For license renewal, a licensee shall submit all of the following to the board:(1) An application and the required fee as established by the board by regulation.(2) Proof of continuing education as determined by the board by regulation.(3) Proof of holding a current certification issued by a medical imaging certification organization approved by the board.20260HB2173PN2947 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (n) Professional liability.--(1) A licensee under this section practicing in this Commonwealth shall maintain a level of professional liability insurance coverage in the minimum amount of $1,000,000 per occurrence or claims made. Failure to maintain insurance coverage as required shall subject the licensee to disciplinary proceedings. The board shall accept from the licensee as satisfactory evidence of insurance coverage any of the following:(i) Self-insurance.(ii) Personally purchased liability insurance.(iii) Professional liability insurance coverage provided by the licensee's employer or similar insurance coverage acceptable to the board.(2) An applicant for a license under this section shall provide proof that the applicant has obtained professional liability insurance in accordance with paragraph (1). It is sufficient if the applicant files with the application a copy of a letter from the applicant's professional liability insurance carrier indicating that the applicant will be covered against professional liability in the required amounts effective upon the issuance of the applicant's license to practice in this Commonwealth under this section. Upon issuance of the license, the licensee has 30 days to submit to the board the certificate of insurance or a copy of the policy declaration page.Section 4. Section 22(b) introductory paragraph of the act is amended to read:Section 22. Licenses and certificates; general qualification.* * *20260HB2173PN2947 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Qualifications.--The board shall not issue a license or certificate to an applicant unless the applicant establishes with evidence, verified by an affidavit or affirmation of the applicant, that the applicant is of legal age, is of good moral character and is not addicted to the intemperate use of alcohol or the habitual use of narcotics or other habit-forming drugs and that the applicant has completed the educational requirements prescribed by the board and otherwise satisfies the qualifications for the license or certificate contained in or authorized by this act. In assessing the moral character of an applicant with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions). The board shall not issue a license or certificate to an applicant who has been convicted of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, unless:* * *Section 5. Section 45 of the act is repealed:[Section 45. Radiologic procedures; education and training required.(a) Supervision.--On and after January 1, 1988, no auxiliary personnel shall perform radiologic procedures on the premises of a medical doctor unless such person is under the direct supervision of a medical doctor and unless such person has passed an examination approved by the board and administered in accordance with section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 20260HB2173PN2947 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, provided that no such auxiliary personnel shall perform radiologic procedures for therapeutic purposes unless the medical doctor under whose direct supervision such auxiliary personnel is acting is on the premises at the time the radiologic procedures are performed.(b) Exclusion.--The board shall have the authority, after notice and hearing, to prohibit an auxiliary personnel from performing radiologic procedures if the continued performance of radiologic procedures by the auxiliary personnel is determined by the board to pose a threat to the health, safety or welfare of the public.(c) Penalty.--It shall be unlawful under this act to knowingly permit radiologic procedures to be performed in violation of this section or in violation of the regulations promulgated or orders issued in accordance with this section.(d) Education and testing.--No auxiliary personnel who has or obtains a license, certificate or registration issued by, or on behalf of, a board within the Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs or a comparable board of another state, or who has obtained certification as the result of satisfactory completion of a test and an educational course accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the board, shall be required to undergo any additional education or testing pursuant to this section if radiologic procedures were included in the education or the examination which he or she was required to complete successfully in order to be eligible for such license, certificate, registration or certification.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "radiologic procedures" means the use of ionizing radiation for 20260HB2173PN2947 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.]Section 6. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of section 13.7 of the act.(2) Section 16.4 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, is repealed.Section 7. The State Board of Medicine shall promulgate final regulations necessary to implement the addition of section 13.7 of the act within 24 months of the effective date of this section.Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2173PN2947 - 20 - 12345678910111213